Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Chapter 7 Labor Unions; Disputes and Injunctions; Right to Work

Cross references. —

For provision requiring legislature to provide for voluntary submission of differences to arbitrators, see art. 19, § 8, Wyo. Const.

As to Uniform Arbitration Act, see §§

1-36-101

through

1-36-119

.

Applied

in

Mobil Coal Producing, Inc. v. Parks, 704 P.2d 702,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 527

(Wyo. 1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

48 Am. Jur. 2d Labor and Labor Relations §§ 1748 to 1767; 1823 to 2071.

Collective bargaining agreement as restricting right to strike or picket, 2 ALR2d 1278.

Merit increase in wages as subject of collective bargaining or unfair labor practices, 3 ALR2d 997.

Inviting or soliciting return of striking employees to work as unfair labor practice, 4 ALR2d 1356.

Legality of, and injunction against, peaceful picketing as affected by employer's lack of opportunity to negotiate with union or employees, 11 ALR2d 1069.

Picketing of place of business by persons not employed therein, 11 ALR2d 1274.

Severability of provisions in collective bargaining labor contracts, 14 ALR2d 846.

Right of third party in area picketed during labor dispute, who has no connection with the dispute, to relief against such picketing, 15 ALR2d 1396.

Construction and effect of termination in automatic renewal provisions in collective bargaining agreements, 17 ALR2d 754.

Validity of governmental requirement of oath of allegiance or loyalty, 18 ALR2d 268.

Right of individual employee to enforce collective labor agreement against employer, 18 ALR2d 352.

Spontaneous or informal activity of employees as that of “labor organization” or as “concerted activities” within protection of Labor Relations Act, 19 ALR2d 566, 75 ALR Fed 262.

Matters arbitrable under arbitration provisions of collective labor contract, 24 ALR2d 752.

Nonprofit charitable institutions as within operation of labor statutes, 26 ALR2d 1020.

Liability of labor organization for inducing breach of contract, 26 ALR2d 1227.

Construction and effect of vacation pay clause in collective labor agreement, 30 ALR2d 351.

Right of labor union to strike, picket, or impose boycott to compel payment by employer of fine or other penalty, 32 ALR2d 342.

State's power to enjoin violation of collective labor contract as affected by Federal Labor Relations Acts, 32 ALR2d 829.

State court's power to enjoin picketing by illegal means as affected by Labor Management Relations Act, 32 ALR2d 1026.

Validity and construction of statutes regulating or prohibiting coercive action by labor unions in jurisdictional disputes, 33 ALR2d 340.

Picketing, by employees of a plant where labor dispute exists, at another plant of employer where there is no labor dispute, as unfair labor practice, 37 ALR2d 687.

Construction and effect of severance or dismissal pay provisions of collective labor agreement, 40 ALR2d 1044.

Unfair labor practices: discrimination between union members and nonmembers as to wage increases, vacations and the like, 41 ALR2d 654.

Continuance or termination of labor union's status or authority as bargaining agent, 42 ALR2d 1415.

Discontinuance of previous employee benefits not covered in collective bargaining agreement as unfair labor practice, 45 ALR2d 689.

National Labor Relations Act: sit-down strike, violence or similar misconduct during strike affecting employer's right to discharge employee or employee's right to be reinstated after strike, 45 ALR2d 887.

Rights and remedies of workmen blacklisted by labor union, 46 ALR2d 1124.

Blacklisting of workman by labor union as unfair labor practice, 46 ALR2d 1124.

Construction and effect of holiday-pay clause in collective labor agreement, 47 ALR2d 1034.

Eviction of employee or threat thereof from housing furnished by employer as constituting unlawful coercion or unfair labor practice, 48 ALR2d 995.

Constitutionality of statutes providing for arbitration of labor disputes, 55 ALR2d 432.

Discharge or retirement of employee because of age or physical disability as within provision of collective bargaining contract limiting employer's right to discharge employees, 56 ALR2d 991.

Substitution of independent contractor for employees as violation of collective labor contract, 57 ALR2d 1399.

Stock purchase or stock bonus plan as within provision of federal labor relations acts requiring employer to bargain collectively, 58 ALR2d 843.

Liability of labor union members for wrongful suspension or expulsion of member, 74 ALR2d 783.

Refusal of union to bargain with particular agent or representative selected by employer as unfair labor practice under National Labor Management Relations Act, 78 ALR2d 768.

Exhaustion of remedies within labor union as condition of resort to civil courts by expelled or suspended member, 87 ALR2d 1099.

Performance or breach of seniority provisions in labor relations agreements, 90 ALR2d 975.

Provision forbidding making membership in labor organization a condition to employment, 92 ALR2d 598.

Duty of furnishing information to employee representatives, under National Labor Relations Acts, 2 ALR3d 880.

Effect of alleged misstatements or misrepresentations in campaign literature, material or leaflets on validity of representation election, 3 ALR3d 889.

Removal of all or part of operation to new location as unfair labor practice, 5 ALR3d 733.

Employer's decision to have work done by independent contractors rather than by employees as unfair labor practice, 6 ALR3d 1148.

Manner of marking ballot as affecting validity of employee's vote in elections under Labor Relations Acts, 11 ALR3d 818.

Combination of separate plants or units of same employer as single bargaining unit, 12 ALR3d 787.

Multi-employer group as appropriate bargaining unit under Labor Relations Act, 12 ALR3d 805.

Union's representations concerning initiation fees or dues as affecting its status as bargaining representative, 13 ALR3d 990.

Discontinuance or suspension by employer of all or part of his operations or lockout of employees as unfair labor practice, 20 ALR3d 403.

Constitutionality of statute regulating employment agencies, 20 ALR3d 599.

Request or demand for, or refusal of, transcription or recording of bargaining sessions or grievance negotiations as unfair labor practice, 24 ALR3d 706.

Right of exclusion of applicants for membership, 33 ALR3d 1305.

Power of court to resubmit matter to arbitrators for correction or clarification, because of ambiguity or error in, or omission from, arbitration award, 37 ALR3d 200.

Bargainable or negotiable issues in state public employment labor relations, 84 ALR3d 242.

Damage liability of state or local public employee's union or union officials for lawful work stoppage, 84 ALR3d 336.

Determination as to good faith in abolition of public officer or employment subject to civil service or merit system, 87 ALR3d 1165.

Union security arrangements in state public employment, 95 ALR3d 1102.

Who are supervisors for purposes of bargaining-unit determinations in state public employment labor relations, 96 ALR3d 723.

Discharge from private employment on ground of political views or conduct, 29 ALR4th 287.

Failure to pursue or exhaust remedies under union contract as affecting employee's right of state civil action for retaliatory discharge, 32 ALR4th 350.

State criminal prosecutions of union officer or member for specific physical threats to employer's property or person, in connection with labor dispute, 43 ALR4th 1141.

Rights of state and municipal public employees in grievance proceedings, 46 ALR4th 912.

Procedural rights of union members in union disciplinary proceedings — modern state cases, 79 ALR4th 941.

Liability for breach of employment severance agreement, 27 ALR5th 1.

Appeal to racial or religious prejudice or feeling as affecting validity of representation election under National Labor Relations Act, 5 ALR Fed 867.

Arbitration agreement or other private contract as precluding filing of unfair labor practice charges with National Labor Relations Board, 6 ALR Fed 272.

Actions against unions for inducing strikes and secondary boycotts, 7 ALR Fed 767.

Interference with wearing union insignia as unfair labor practice, 11 ALR Fed 26.

Settlement of unfair labor practice cases, 14 ALR Fed 25.

Propriety of including, in bargaining unit, employees acting in confidential capacity or possessing confidential information, 23 ALR Fed 756.

Forbidding access to employer's property as unfair labor practice, 26 ALR Fed 427.

Notice proposing “modification” rather than “termination” of labor contract as sufficient to prevent automatic extension or renewal of contract, 57 ALR Fed 393.

Hospital house staff physicians as “employees” under § 2(3) of the National Labor Relations Act (29 USC § 152(3)), and therefore subject to provisions of act, as amended, 57 ALR Fed 608.

Employer's right to withdraw from multi-employer bargaining unit after the commencement of bargaining negotiations, 65 ALR Fed 18.

Union's discriminatory operation of exclusive hiring held as unfair labor practice under § 8(b) of National Labor Relations Act (29 USC § 158(b)), 73 ALR Fed 171.

Employee committee or similar group as “labor organization” under the National Labor Relations Act (29 USC §§ 151 et seq.), 75 ALR Fed 262.

Damages for mental distress as recoverable in action against employer under § 301 of Labor Management Relations Act (29 USC § 185) or under § 502 of Employee Retirement Income Security Act (29 USC § 1132), 77 ALR Fed 181.

What constitutes impairment of proposed intervenor's interest to support intervention as matter of right under Rule 24(a)(2) of Federal Rules of Civil Procedure in labor actions, 77 ALR Fed 201.

Requirements for obtaining court approval of rejection of collective bargaining agreement by debtor in possession or trustee in bankruptcy under 11 USC § 1113(b) and (c), 89 ALR Fed 299.

Pre-emption, by § 301(a) of Labor-Management Relations Act of 1947 (29 USC § 185(a)), of employee's state-law action for infliction of emotional distress, 101 ALR Fed 395.

Suits by union members against union officers under 29 USC § 501(b), 114 ALR Fed 417.

Increase, or promise of increase, or withholding of increase, of wages as unfair labor practice under National Labor Relations Act, 137 ALR Fed 333.

“Mass discharge” of employees as evidence of unfair labor practice under §§ 9(a)(1) and (3) of National Labor Relations Act (29 USC § 158(a)(1), (3)), 137 ALR Fed 445.

Job placement of returning strikers as unfair labor practice under § 158(a) of National Labor Relations Act (29 U.S.C. § 158(a), 145 ALR Fed 619.

51 C.J.S. Labor Relations §§ 148 to 216; 51A C.J.S. Labor Relations §§ 263 to 327.

§ 27-7-101.
Policy of state; organized labor permitted.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state of Wyoming that workers have the right to organize for the purpose of protecting the freedom of labor, and of bargaining collectively with employers of labor for acceptable terms and conditions of employment, and that in the exercise of the aforesaid rights, workers should be free from the interference, restraint or coercion of employers of labor, or their agents in any concerted activities for their mutual aid or protection.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 37, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 54-501; W.S. 1957, § 27-239.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision providing for the protection of labor, see art. 1, § 22, Wyo. Const.

Right to join union implies right not to join union. —

This section does not specifically state that persons are entitled to choose whether to join a union or not. But that is implied therein, since the right to join a labor union implies the right not to join one. Hagen v. Culinary Workers Alliance Local, 70 Wyo. 165, 246 P.2d 778,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1952).

Applies only to private industry. —

Generally statutes governing labor relations between employers and employees are construed only to apply to private industry. Retail Clerks Local 187 v. University of Wyoming, 531 P.2d 884,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1975).

University of Wyoming not authorized to bargain collectively. —

This section, which recognizes the right of labor to bargain collectively with employers of labor, does not authorize the University of Wyoming to collectively bargain with its employees. Retail Clerks Local 187 v. University of Wyoming, 531 P.2d 884,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1975).

Nor are municipalities. —

Had the legislative intent been that municipalities be forced to engage in collective bargaining the legislature would have been explicit in their language. Retail Clerks Local 187 v. University of Wyoming, 531 P.2d 884,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1975).

Jurisdiction of state court to grant injunctive relief against mass picketing. —

Where defendant union and its members had no right to engage in mass picketing and, in picketing, make threats, use abusive language, prohibit entrance to the premises to customers of plaintiffs, inflict property damage or obstruct the highways, state court has jurisdiction to grant injunctive relief. Buckman v. UMW, Local 7247, 80 Wyo. 199, 339 P.2d 398,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 28

.

Utterances of teacher in behalf of union activities were protected

by United States and Wyoming constitutions. Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

And were not grounds for nonrenewal of contract. —

Where there was no proof that the statements made by a teacher in pursuit of his union activities were made “with knowledge of their falsity or with reckless disregard for their truth or falsity” and there was no proof that his published statements have impeded the performance of his teaching duties or in any way disrupted the functions of the school, the criticized publications furnished no cause or grounds for failure to renew the teacher's employment contract. Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

Law reviews. —

See comment, “The Right of Wyoming State and Municipal Employees to Organize, Receive Exclusive Recognition, and Bargain Collectively,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 605 (1970).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Who are employees forbidden to strike under state enactments or state common-law rules prohibiting strikes by public employees or stated classes of public employees, 22 ALR4th 1103.

What statute of limitations applies to state law action by public sector employee for breach of union’s duty of fair representation,
12 ALR5th 950.

Right of public defenders to join collective bargaining unit, 108 ALR5th 241.

Charity-sponsored work programs for handicapped persons as subject to provisions of National Labor Relations Act (29 USC §§ 141 et seq.), 68 ALR Fed 905.

Collective bargaining agreement as restricting right to engage in concerted activities, other than striking or picketing, under § 7 of National Labor Relations Act (29 USC § 157), 69 ALR Fed 812.

Propriety, under § 10(c) of National Labor Relations Act (29 USC § 160(c)) authorizing affirmative action by NLRB as remedy for unfair labor practices, of order granting union access to company facilities, 71 ALR Fed 631.

What constitutes restraint or coercion of employer in selection of representative for collective bargaining or adjustment of grievances, designated as unfair labor practices under § 8(b)(1)(B) of National Labor Relations Act (29 USC § 158(b)(1)(B)), 72 ALR Fed 330.

Employer's right, under § 8(a)(1) of National Labor Relations Act (29 USC § 158(a)(1)), to ask employee whether employee intends to participate in strike, 72 ALR Fed 818.

When is subsequent business operation bound by existing collective bargaining agreement between labor union and predecessor employer, 88 ALR Fed 89.

Employer's duty to furnish information regarding financial status to employees' representative under National Labor Relations Act, 106 ALR Fed 694.

Construction of provision of 29 USC § 481(c) that unions and their officers shall “refrain from discrimination in favor of or against any candidate (for union office) with respect to use of lists of members”, 113 ALR Fed 389.

Increase, or promise of increase, or withholding of increase, of wages as unfair labor practice under National Labor Relations Act, 137 ALR Fed 333.

“Mass discharge” of employees as evidence of unfair labor practice under §§ 9(a)(1) and (3) of National Labor Relations Act (29 USCS § 158(a)(1), (3)), 137 ALR Fed 445.

Construction of Freedom of Speech and Assembly Provisions of § 101 (a)(2) of Labor—Management Reporting and Disclosure Act of 1959 (29 USCS § 411(a)(2)), Included in Bill of Rights of Member of Labor Organization. 143 ALR Fed 1.

§ 27-7-102.
Issuance of injunctions limited by public policy.

No court of the state of Wyoming shall have jurisdiction to issue any restraining order or temporary or permanent injunction contrary to the public policy declared in this chapter.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 37, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 54-502; W.S. 1957, § 27-240.

§ 27-7-103.
Acts not subject to be enjoined.

No court of the state of Wyoming shall have jurisdiction to issue any restraining order or temporary or permanent injunction in any case involving or growing out of any labor dispute to prohibit any person or persons participating or interested in such dispute from doing, whether singly or in concert, any of the following acts:

Ceasing or refusing to perform any work or to remain in any relation of employment;

Becoming or remaining a member of any labor organization or of any employer organization;

Paying or giving to, or withholding from, any person participating or interested in such labor dispute, any strike or unemployment benefits or insurance, or other moneys or things of value;

By all lawful means aiding any person participating or interested in any labor dispute who is being proceeded against in, or is prosecuting, any action or suit in any court of the United States or of any state;

Giving publicity to the existence of, or the facts involved in, any labor dispute, whether by advertising, speaking, patrolling, or by any other method not involving fraud or violence;

Assembling peaceably to act or to organize to act in promotion of their interests in a labor dispute;

Advising or notifying any person of an intention to do any of the acts heretofore specified;

Agreeing with other persons to do or not to do any of the acts heretofore specified; and

Advising, urging, or otherwise causing or inducing without fraud or violence the acts heretofore specified, regardless of any such undertaking or promise.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 37, § 3; 1937, ch. 15, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 54-503; W.S. 1957, § 27-241.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Quoted

in

Logan v. Stannard, 439 P.2d 24,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1968).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Collective bargaining agreement as restricting right to engage in concerted activities, other than striking or picketing, under § 7 of National Labor Relations Act (29 USC § 157), 69 ALR Fed 812.

§ 27-7-104.
Unlawful combination or conspiracy not grounds for injunction.

No court of the state of Wyoming shall have jurisdiction to issue a restraining order or temporary or permanent injunction upon the ground that any of the persons participating or interested in a labor dispute constitute or are engaged in an unlawful combination or conspiracy because of the doing in concert of the acts enumerated in W.S.

27-7-103

.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 37, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 54-504; W.S. 1957, § 27-242.

§ 27-7-105.
Hearing prerequisite for injunction; temporary restraining orders.

No court of the state of Wyoming shall have jurisdiction to issue a temporary or permanent injunction in any case involving or growing out of a labor dispute except after hearing the testimony of witnesses in open court (with opportunity for cross-examination) in support of the allegations of a complaint made under oath, and testimony in opposition thereto, if offered. Provided, however, that nothing in this section shall prevent any such court from issuing a temporary restraining order in accordance with the code of civil procedure, but any such restraining order shall provide that a hearing for a temporary injunction shall be held not later than three (3) days after the granting of such restraining order, and such restraining order shall not be effective beyond the date of such hearing for a temporary injunction.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 37, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 54-505; W.S. 1957, § 27-243.

Cross references. —

As to temporary restraining orders, see §

1-28-102

and Rule 65(b), W.R.C.P.

Cited

in

Garber v. UMW, 524 P.2d 578,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1974).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Refusal of NLRB to file unfair labor practice complaint as subject to review in independent suit in federal district court, 69 ALR Fed 870.

§ 27-7-106.
Injunction to include only specific acts.

Every restraining order or injunction granted in a case involving or growing out of a labor dispute shall include only a prohibition of such specific act or acts as may be expressly complained of in the petition filed in such case and sustained by competent evidence adduced in open court.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 37, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 54-507; W.S. 1957, § 27-244.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 8, ch. 37, Laws 1933, repealed all acts and parts of acts in conflict with the provisions of that act.

§ 27-7-107.
Limitation on liability of officers, members or organizations.

No officer or member of any association or organization, and no association or organization participating or interested in a labor dispute, shall be held responsible or liable in any court of the state of Wyoming for the unlawful acts of individual officers, members, or agents, except upon clear proof of actual participation in, or actual authorization of, such acts, or ratification of such acts after actual knowledge thereof.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 37, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 54-506; W.S. 1957, § 27-245.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability, under statute, of labor union or its membership for torts committed in connection with primary labor activities — state cases, 85 ALR4th 979.

What statute of limitations applies to state law action by public sector employee for breach of union’s duty of fair representation,
12 ALR5th 950.

Construction of provision of 29 USC § 481(c) that unions and their officers shall “refrain from discrimination in favor of or against any candidate (for union office) with respect to use of lists of members”, 113 ALR Fed 389.

§ 27-7-108.
Right to work; definitions.

The term “labor organization” means any organization, or any agency or employee representation committee, plan or arrangement, in which employees participate and which exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, or conditions of work.

The term “person” shall include a corporation, association, company, firm or labor organization, as well as a natural person.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 39, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-245.1.

Law reviews. —

For note, “Right to Work: Prohibition of Expression or Coercion,” see 17 Wyo. L.J. 214 (1963).

For comment, “The Right of Wyoming State and Municipal Employees to Organize, Receive Exclusive Recognition, and Bargain Collectively,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 605 (1970).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Employee committee or similar group as “labor organization” under the National Labor Relations Act (29 USC §§ 151 et seq.), 75 ALR Fed 262.

Validity, construction, and application of state right-to-work provisions, 105 ALR5th 243.

§ 27-7-109.
Right to work; membership in labor organization not required.

No person is required to become or remain a member of any labor organization as a condition of employment or continuation of employment.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 39, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 27-245.2.

Sections

27-7-109

through

27-7-111

deal fully with the conditions of employment enumerated in the title to ch.

39, Laws 1963. Local 415 of Int'l Elec. Workers v. Hansen, 400 P.2d 531,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1965).

And they are in keeping with the provisions of the federal Labor Management Relations Act

(1947), § 14(b), 29 USCS § 164(b) (1958), as interpreted by the United States supreme court. Local 415 of Int'l Elec. Workers v. Hansen, 400 P.2d 531,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1965).

Cited

in

General Chem. Corp. v. Unemployment Ins. Comm'n, 906 P.2d 380,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 27-7-110.
Right to work; abstention from membership in labor organization not required.

No person is required to abstain or refrain from membership in any labor organization as a condition of employment or continuation of employment.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 39, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 27-245.3.

Cross references. —

See notes to §

27-7-109

.

§ 27-7-111.
Right to work; payment or nonpayment of dues not required.

No person is required to pay or refrain from paying any dues, fees, or other charges of any kind to any labor organization as a condition of employment or continuation of employment.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 39, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 27-245.4.

Cross references. —

See notes to §

27-7-109

.

§ 27-7-112.
Right to work; connection with or approval by labor organization not required.

No person is required to have any connection with, or be recommended or approved by, or be cleared through, any labor organization as a condition of employment or continuation of employment.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 39, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 27-245.5.

This section is unconstitutional. —

See International Bhd. of Elec. Workers v. Hansen, 400 P.2d 531,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1965).

This section goes beyond mere implementation of §§

27-7-109

through

27-7-111

,

by clear and unequivocal language. International Bhd. of Elec. Workers v. Hansen, 400 P.2d 531,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1965).

And is separable from those sections. —

See International Bhd. of Elec. Workers v. Hansen, 400 P.2d 531,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1965).

As it impinges on area covered by federal statute. —

The legislature demonstrated a clear intent and purpose by this section to set apart from the processes of collective bargaining, upon matters protected by the Labor Management Relations Act (1947), those employees who were not members of a union. That, of course, could not be done. Any such attempt is to impinge upon an area that is not open to the states under the provisions of Labor Management Relations Act (1947), § 14(b), 29 USCS § 164(b) (1958). International Bhd. of Elec. Workers v. Hansen, 400 P.2d 531,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1965).

§ 27-7-113.
Right to work; misdemeanor to impose or try to impose prohibited requirements; civil liability.

Any person who directly or indirectly places upon any other person any requirement or compulsion prohibited by this act [§§

27-7-108

through

27-7-115

], or who makes any agreement written or oral, express or implied, to do so, or who engages in any lockout, layoff, strike, work stoppage, slow down, picketing, boycott or other action or conduct, a purpose or effect of which is to impose upon any person, directly or indirectly, any requirement or compulsion prohibited by this act, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall also be liable in damages to any person injured thereby.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 39, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 27-245.6.

§ 27-7-114.
Right to work; injunction against prohibited conduct.

Any person injured or threatened with injury by any action or conduct prohibited by this act [§§

27-7-108

through

27-7-115

] shall, notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, be entitled to injunctive relief therefrom.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 39, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 27-245.7.

§ 27-7-115.
Right to work; penalties.

Any person convicted of a misdemeanor, as defined in this act [§§

27-7-108

through

27-7-115

], shall be punished by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 39, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 27-245.8.

Cited

in

General Chem. Corp. v. Unemployment Ins. Comm'n, 906 P.2d 380,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1995).